Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-517
Memory care endorsement.

An assisted-living facility which is an Alzheimer’s special care unit may apply for a memory care endorsement as provided in the Health Care Facility Licensure Act but shall not advertise itself as an endorsed memory care unit without such endorsement.

Laws 2016, LB698, § 27.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.